Maryland, session 2026, SB0330.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
3–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0330*

SENATE BILL 330
(b) “Administratively charged” means that a police officer has been formally
accused of misconduct in an administrative proceeding.
(d) “Exonerated” means that a police officer acted in accordance with the law and
agency policy.
(f) “Not administratively charged” means that a determination has been made
not to administratively charge a police officer in connection with alleged misconduct.
(k) “Unfounded” means that the allegations against a police officer are not
supported by fact.
3–112.
(A) [A] IN THIS SECTION, “INVESTIGATION RECORD” MEANS A record relating
to an administrative or criminal investigation of misconduct by a police officer, including
an internal affairs investigatory record, a hearing record, and records relating to a
disciplinary decision[,].
(B) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, AN
INVESTIGATION RECORD may not be:
(1) expunged; or
(2) destroyed by a law enforcement agency.
(C) ALL INVESTIGATION RECORDS RELATING TO A COMPLAINT OF
MISCONDUCT BY A POLICE OFFICER SHALL BE REMOVED FROM THE POLICE
OFFICER’S PERSONNEL RECORD 3 YEARS AFTER:
(1) AN ADMINISTRATIVE CHARGING COMMITTEE ISSUES A
DETERMINATION NOT TO ADMINISTRATIVELY CHARGE THE POLICE OFFICER IN
CONNECTION WITH THE COMPLAINT UNDER § 3–104 OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(2) A TRIAL BOARD ISSUES A FINDING OF UNFOUNDED OR
EXONERATED IN CONNECTION WITH THE COMPLAINT UNDER § 3–106 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.